New York, session 2025-2026, A9448.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 11 of section 458-a of the real property tax 2 law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the real proper- 3 ty tax law relating to establishing a real property tax exemption for 4 veterans who have a one hundred percent service connected disability, as 5 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1183 and A. 74, is amended to 6 read as follows: 7 11. [A county, city, town, village or school district may adopt a 8 local law or resolution to include] In addition to any other exemption 9 from taxation on real property which may be allowed to veterans pursuant 10 to the provisions of this chapter, including subdivision three of 11 section four hundred fifty-eight of this title, the primary residence of 12 any seriously disabled veteran who: 13 (a)(i) was discharged or released therefrom under honorable condi- 14 tions; 15 (ii) has a qualifying condition, as defined in section one of the 16 veterans' services law, and has received a discharge other than bad 17 conduct or dishonorable from such service; or 18 (iii) is a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section one of the 19 veterans' services law, and has received a discharge other than bad 20 conduct or dishonorable from such service; and 21 (b) (i) is considered to be permanently and totally disabled as a 22 result of military service; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00391-04-6 A. 9448 2 1 (ii) is rated one hundred percent disabled by the United States 2 department of veterans affairs; 3 (iii) has been rated by the United States department of veterans 4 affairs as individually unemployable; and 5 (iv) who is eligible for pecuniary assistance from the United States 6 government, or has received pecuniary assistance from the United States 7 government and has applied such assistance toward the acquisition or 8 modification of a suitable housing unit with special features or movable 9 facilities made necessary by the nature of the veterans' disability, and 10 the necessary [law] land therefor shall be fully exempt from taxation 11 and special district charges, assessments and special ad valorem levies, 12 provided that such veteran meets all other requirements of this section. 13 In no case shall the taxable assessed value of the property of a quali- 14 fying veteran be reduced below zero. Nothing contained herein shall be 15 construed to require or authorize the discontinuance of any exemption 16 granted pursuant to subdivision three of section four hundred fifty- 17 eight of this title. 18 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the real 19 property tax law relating to establishing a real property tax exemption 20 for veterans who have a one hundred percent service connected disabili- 21 ty, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1183 and A. 74, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to assess- 24 ment rolls [prepared] based on taxable status dates occurring on and 25 after [January 2] October 1, 2026. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 27 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 28 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the real property 29 tax law relating to establishing a real property tax exemption for 30 veterans who have a one hundred percent service connected disability, as 31 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1183 and A. 74, takes effect.